Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB606.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 6134YC (2) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. STUDENT ATHLETICS ââ REPORTS TO GENERAL 1 ASSEMBLY. 2 1. Iowa state university of science and technology and 3 the university of northern Iowa shall each submit a report to 4 the general assembly by July 30, 2026, on the feasibility of 5 establishing menâs baseball and womenâs wrestling programs 6 at their respective institutions. The report must include a 7 plan and timeline for establishing such programs as well as an 8 analysis of the potential cost of establishment and the ongoing 9 financial impact of maintaining such programs, including 10 any potential increase in tuition received due to increased 11 enrollment of student athletes. 12 2. Southwestern community college shall submit a report 13 to the general assembly by July 30, 2026, on the feasibility 14 of establishing a menâs wrestling program. The report must 15 include a plan and timeline for establishing the program as 16 well as an analysis of the potential cost of establishment 17 and the ongoing financial impact of maintaining the program, 18 including any potential increase in tuition received due to 19 increased enrollment of student athletes. 20 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 21 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 22